Utah statutes.
13-38a-203.   Private action.

(1)  A person may bring an action in any state court of competent jurisdiction against a person that violates any of the requirements of this chapter.

(2)  In an action under Subsection (1), a person may:

(a)  recover the amount of any actual damages caused by the violation of this chapter;

(b)  recover court costs and reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court; and

(c)  seek to enjoin conduct in violation of this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 421, 2013 General Session

